Tennessee, session 114, HB1347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-6-109, is amended by inserting
"the legislative librarian," after "The department shall report quarterly to".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1347
002843
- 1 -